Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-1118.2 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “cell-cultured meat”, also referred


to as lab-grown meat, cultivated meat, clean meat, in vitro meat,


imitation meat, synthetic meat, and fake meat, means meat developed


from animal cell cultures rather than through traditional raising


and slaughter of livestock. It does not include imitation meat made


of non-meat ingredients including, but not limited to, plant-based


protein.


B. A licensed food establishment shall not offer for sale any


food or other product intended for human consumption that contains



Req. No. 955 Page 1


cell-cultured meat unless the establishment is in compliance with


the rules promulgated under subsection C of this section.


C. The State Commissioner of Health shall promulgate rules


requiring licensed food establishments that offer for sale any food


or other product intended for human consumption that contains cell-


cultured meat to disclose such fact to customers, including


specification of any and all food or products that contain cell-


cultured meat. The rules may, as deemed necessary and appropriate


by the Commissioner, prescribe different requirements for different


types of food establishments.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-955 MR 1/16/2025 3:11:37 PM























Req. No. 955 Page 2